Maryland, session 2025, SB0855.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
5.5–110.
(E) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES TO A TRAIN OR LIGHT ENGINE USED IN
CONNECTION WITH THE MOVEMENT OF RAILROAD FREIGHT.
(2) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A TRAIN OR LIGHT ENGINE
USED IN CONNECTION WITH THE MOVEMENT OF RAILROAD FREIGHT INVOLVING:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0855*

SENATE BILL 855
(I) HOSTLER SERVICE; OR
(II) UTILITY EMPLOYEES IN YARD SERVICE.
(3) A TRAIN OR LIGHT ENGINE USED IN CONNECTION WITH THE
MOVEMENT OF RAILROAD FREIGHT MAY NOT BE OPERATED IN THE STATE UNLESS
THE TRAIN OR LIGHT ENGINE HAS A CREW OF AT LEAST TWO INDIVIDUALS.
(4) (I) A PERSON WHO WILLFULLY VIOLATES THIS SUBSECTION IS
SUBJECT TO A CIVIL PENALTY ASSESSED BY THE COMMISSIONER OF:
1. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN ITEM 2 OF THIS
SUBPARAGRAPH, A FINE NOT TO EXCEED $10,000; OR
2. IF THE PERSON PREVIOUSLY COMMITTED A WILLFUL
VIOLATION WITHIN THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 3 YEARS, A FINE NOT TO EXCEED
$25,000.
(II) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, A RAILROAD COMPANY SHALL BE SOLELY RESPONSIBLE FOR THE
ACTIONS OF ITS AGENTS OR EMPLOYEES WHO VIOLATE THIS SUBSECTION.
(F) (1) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY WITH RESPECT TO A
PASSENGER TRAIN WHILE THE TRAIN IS BOARDING OR DISCHARGING PASSENGERS.
(2) A RAILROAD COMPANY MAY NOT BLOCK A RAILROAD GRADE
CROSSING OR HIGHWAY GRADE CROSSING WITH A STANDING TRAIN FOR MORE THAN
5 MINUTES.
(3) A RAILROAD COMPANY THAT VIOLATES THIS SUBSECTION IS
SUBJECT TO A CIVIL FINE NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 FOR EACH VIOLATION TO BE
ASSESSED BY THE COMMISSIONER.
(G) (1) A RAILROAD COMPANY MAY NOT OPERATE A FREIGHT OR WORK
TRAIN THAT EXCEEDS 8,500 FEET IN LENGTH ON A MAIN TRACK OR BRANCH LINE.
(2) A RAILROAD COMPANY THAT VIOLATES THIS SUBSECTION IS
SUBJECT TO A CIVIL FINE NOT EXCEEDING $10,000 FOR EACH VIOLATION TO BE
ASSESSED BY THE COMMISSIONER.
5.5–110.1.
(A) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL ESTABLISH AND MAINTAIN A REPORTING

SENATE BILL 855 3
SYSTEM REGARDING THE TRANSPORTATION OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS AND WASTE
BY RAIL IN THE STATE.
(B) (1) INFORMATION IN THE REPORTING SYSTEM MAY NOT BE
PROVIDED TO THE PUBLIC AND IS NOT SUBJECT TO DISCLOSURE UNDER THE
PUBLIC INFORMATION ACT.
(2) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL MAKE INFORMATION CONTAINED IN
THE REPORTING SYSTEM AVAILABLE TO:
(I) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF EMERGENCY
MANAGEMENT; AND
(II) THE FEDERAL EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT AGENCY.
5.5–111.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “EQUIPMENT DEFECT” MEANS:
(I) A HOT WHEEL;
(II) A HOT WHEEL BEARING;
(III) A DEFECTIVE WHEEL BEARING DETECTED THROUGH
ACOUSTICS;
(IV) DRAGGING EQUIPMENT;
(V) EXCESSIVE TRAIN CAR HEIGHT OR WEIGHT;
(VI) A SHIFTED LOAD;
(VII) A LOW AIR HOSE;
(VIII) A RAIL TEMPERATURE DEFECT; OR
(IX) A WHEEL CONDITION DEFECT.
(3) “WAYSIDE DETECTOR SYSTEM” MEANS AN ELECTRONIC DEVICE
OR A SERIES OF CONNECTED OR NETWORKED DEVICES THAT SCAN PASSING TRAINS,

SENATE BILL 855
ROLLING STOCK, AND ON–TRACK EQUIPMENT FOR DEFECTS.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A RAILROAD COMPANY THAT OWNS OR
IS OTHERWISE RESPONSIBLE FOR A RAILROAD TRACK THAT THE FEDERAL
RAILROAD ADMINISTRATION HAS DESIGNATED CLASS IV OR GREATER.
(C) (1) EACH RAILROAD COMPANY SHALL INSTALL A WAYSIDE DETECTOR
SYSTEM ON RAILROAD TRACKS OWNED OR OTHERWISE UNDER THE RESPONSIBILITY
OF THE RAILROAD COMPANY THAT THE FEDERAL RAILROAD ADMINISTRATION HAS
DESIGNATED CLASS IV OR GREATER.
(2) (I) EACH RAILROAD COMPANY SHALL INSTALL, MAINTAIN,
REPAIR, AND OPERATE EACH WAYSIDE DETECTOR SYSTEM IN ACCORDANCE WITH
ALL APPLICABLE GUIDELINES AND REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE FEDERAL
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION.
(II) A RAILROAD COMPANY SHALL REMOVE AND REPLACE AN
EXPIRED, BROKEN, OR OBSOLETE WAYSIDE DETECTOR SYSTEM OR PART OF A
WAYSIDE DETECTOR SYSTEM.
(III) A RAILROAD COMPANY SHALL PLACE EACH WAYSIDE
DETECTOR SYSTEM AT AN APPROPRIATE DISTANCE, AS DETERMINED BY THE
COMMISSIONER, FROM OTHER WAYSIDE DETECTOR SYSTEMS AND AT A LOCATION
THAT WILL ALLOW A TRAIN OPERATOR SUFFICIENT TIME TO:
1. RESPOND TO AN ALERT RECEIVED FROM THE
WAYSIDE DETECTOR SYSTEM;
2. IF NECESSARY, STOP THE TRAIN, ROLLING STOCK, OR
ON–TRACK EQUIPMENT; AND
3. IF NECESSARY, MAKE REPAIRS OR REMOVE
EQUIPMENT THAT IS FOUND BY THE TRAIN OPERATOR TO BE DEFECTIVE.
(3) (I) EACH RAILROAD COMPANY SHALL ESTABLISH WRITTEN
POLICIES AND TRAINING REQUIREMENTS FOR THE RAILROAD COMPANY’S
EMPLOYEES FOR:
1. MONITORING FOR ALERTS FROM WAYSIDE DETECTOR
SYSTEMS; AND
2. RESPONDING TO ALERTS RECEIVED FROM WAYSIDE
DETECTOR SYSTEMS.

SENATE BILL 855 5
(II) A RAILROAD COMPANY SHALL MONITOR THE RESPONSE OF
THE RAILROAD COMPANY’S EMPLOYEES TO ALERTS RECEIVED FROM WAYSIDE
DETECTOR SYSTEMS AND TAKE APPROPRIATE ACTIONS IF AN EMPLOYEE FAILS TO
TAKE THE REQUIRED COURSE OF ACTION.
(D) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL ESTABLISH A PROCESS FOR CERTIFYING
THAT EACH RAILROAD COMPANY HAS INSTALLED WAYSIDE DETECTOR SYSTEMS ON
TRACKS IN THE STATE AS REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(E) (1) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL INVESTIGATE ALLEGED VIOLATIONS
OF THIS SECTION.
(2) (I) IF THE COMMISSIONER DETERMINES THAT A RAILROAD
COMPANY HAS VIOLATED THIS SECTION OR VIOLATED REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY
THE COMMISSIONER UNDER THIS SECTION, THE COMMISSIONER SHALL ISSUE A
WRITTEN REPORT TO THE RAILROAD COMPANY:
1. DETAILING THE REASONS FOR FINDING THAT A
VIOLATION HAS OCCURRED; AND
2. ORDERING THE RAILROAD COMPANY TO CORRECT
THE VIOLATION WITHIN 60 DAYS AFTER THE REPORT IS ISSUED.
(II) IF THE COMMISSIONER ISSUES A REPORT UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE COMMISSIONER SHALL SUBMIT THE
REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(F) (1) A RAILROAD COMPANY THAT FAILS TO CORRECT A VIOLATION
WITHIN 60 DAYS AFTER ISSUANCE OF A REPORT BY THE COMMISSIONER UNDER
SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL FINE NOT EXCEEDING
$10,000 TO BE ASSESSED BY THE COMMISSIONER.
(2) EACH DAY THAT THE PERSON FAILS TO CORRECT A VIOLATION
AFTER THE 60–DAY PERIOD SHALL CONSTITUTE A SEPARATE VIOLATION.
(G) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
5.5–113.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “AUTHORIZED RAILROAD UNION REPRESENTATIVE”

SENATE BILL 855
MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL SELECTED BY THE HEAD OF A LABOR UNION WHOSE
MEMBERS ARE EMPLOYED TO WORK IN THE STATE BY A RAILROAD COMPANY.
(B) (1) A RAILROAD COMPANY SHALL ALLOW AUTHORIZED RAILROAD
UNION REPRESENTATIVES FOR EACH UNION REPRESENTING THE RAILROAD
COMPANY’S EMPLOYEES REASONABLE ACCESS TO ALL PROPERTY OWNED OR
LEASED BY THE RAILROAD COMPANY FOR THE PURPOSE OF INVESTIGATING:
(I) VIOLATIONS OF FEDERAL OR STATE LAWS AND
REGULATIONS; AND
(II) SAFETY HAZARDS THAT MAY RESULT IN INJURY OR DEATH
TO A RAILROAD EMPLOYEE OR BE CONSIDERED A THREAT TO PUBLIC SAFETY.
(2) IF AN AUTHORIZED RAILROAD UNION REPRESENTATIVE IS
CONDUCTING AN INVESTIGATION DESCRIBED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE RAILROAD COMPANY:
(I) SHALL ALLOW THE AUTHORIZED RAILROAD UNION
REPRESENTATIVE TO TAKE PHOTOGRAPHS AND INVESTIGATE RAILROAD PROPERTY
TO THE EXTENT NECESSARY TO ENSURE COMPLIANCE WITH FEDERAL AND STATE
LAWS AND REGULATIONS; AND
(II) MAY NOT ALLEGE THAT THE AUTHORIZED RAILROAD UNION
REPRESENTATIVE IS TRESPASSING ON RAILROAD PROPERTY.
(3) A RAILROAD COMPANY SHALL BE SOLELY RESPONSIBLE FOR THE
ACTIONS OF ITS AGENTS OR EMPLOYEES WHO VIOLATE THIS SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.